Hawaii statutes.
§431:12-115 Establishment and maintenance
of office. (a) Every insurer selling insurance on a mass merchandising
basis shall establish and maintain at all times an office in the State to
conduct the administration of its business and handle claims.

(b) Establishment and maintenance of an office
by any licensed producer of an insurer shall meet the requirements of this
section. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2000, c 24, §12; am L 2002, c 155, §80]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next